Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-614
Authority; promote commercial and general aviation.

An airport authority may in addition to the powers enumerated in section 3-613, encourage, foster, and promote the development of commercial and general aviation for the county which it serves, and advance the interests of such county in aeronautics and in commercial air transportation and its scheduling.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 14, p. 656.